Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5479XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5479XD (5) 91
jm/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 123.5, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. Members of the commission shall be chosen on the basis
of managerial ability and experience as business executives.
Not more than two members of the commission may be the holder
of or have an interest in a permit or license to manufacture
alcoholic liquor, wine, or beer or to sell alcoholic liquor,
wine, or beer at wholesale or retail directly or indirectly;
individually; as a member of a partnership or an association;
as a member, owner, or stockholder, except as an institutional
investor, of a corporation or other entity; or as a relative to
an individual by blood or marriage within the second degree,
do any of the following:
a. Hold a permit or license to manufacture alcoholic
beverages or sell alcoholic beverages at wholesale or retail.
b. Have an interest in the manufacture of or dealing in
alcoholic beverages or in an enterprise or industry in which
alcoholic beverages are required.
c. Receive a commission or profit on the purchase or sale of
alcoholic beverages by any person.
d. Have an interest in or mortgage or deed of trust on any
land or building where alcoholic beverages are manufactured for
sale, offered for sale, or sold, or in any personal property
used in the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages.
Sec. 2. Section 123.5, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3A. In addition to the requirements of
chapter 68B, members of the commission shall not directly or
indirectly use the office of the member to influence, persuade,
or induce any person to adopt their political views or to favor
any particular candidate for an elective or appointive public
office.
NEW SUBSECTION. 6. This section does not prohibit a
commission member from lawfully purchasing and keeping
alcoholic beverages in the possession of the commission member.
LSB 5479XD (5) 91
-1- jm/ns 1/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 3. Section 123.13, Code 2026, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
123.13 Prohibitions —— director and employees.
1. For purposes of this section, “director” means the
director of revenue but does not include the director’s
designee.
2. The requirements of this section are in addition to the
requirements of chapter 68B.
3. The director shall not directly or indirectly;
individually; as a member of a partnership or an association;
as a member, owner, or stockholder, except as an institutional
investor, of a corporation or other entity; or as a relative to
an individual by blood or marriage within the second degree,
do any of the following:
a. Have an interest in the manufacture of or dealing in
alcoholic beverages or in an enterprise or industry in which
alcoholic beverages are required.
b. Receive a commission or profit from the purchase or sale
of alcoholic beverages by any person.
c. Have an interest in or mortgage or deed of trust on any
land or building where alcoholic beverages are manufactured for
sale, offered for sale, or sold, or in any personal property
used in the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages.
4. An employee of the department shall not license,
permit, or participate in the licensing or permitting of a
person, business, or organization that requires a license or
permit under the laws and rules governing alcoholic beverages,
if the employee has an ownership interest related to that
person, business, or organization, or is in a position to
exercise any control over the purchasing of alcoholic beverages
through a position of employment with the person, business, or
organization.
5. An employee of the department shall not enforce any
law or rule governing alcoholic beverages against a person,
business, or organization that requires a license or permit
LSB 5479XD (5) 91
-2- jm/ns 2/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
under the laws and rules governing alcoholic beverages,
if the employee has an ownership interest related to that
person, business, or organization, or is in a position to
exercise any control over the purchase of alcoholic beverages
through a position of employment with the person, business, or
organization.
6. The director or an employee of the department violating
this section or any other provision of this chapter shall, in
addition to any other penalties provided by law, be subject
to disciplinary action up to and including discharge from
employment.
7. This section does not prohibit the director or an
employee of the department from lawfully purchasing and keeping
alcoholic beverages in the possession of the director or the
employee.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate
importance, takes effect upon enactment.